Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.12.150

Ordinances—Authentication and recording.

The city clerk shall authenticate by his or her signature and record in full in a properly indexed book kept for the purpose all ordinances and resolutions adopted by the council. Such book, or copies of ordinances and resolutions, shall be available for inspection by the public at reasonable times and under reasonable conditions.

[ 2009 c 549 s 3014; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.12.150.]